South Dakota, session 2026, HB1009.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 32-14-15.1 be AMENDED:
32-14-15.1. Any person may operate a golf cart on a state or county highway if
the posted speed limit is twenty-five thirty-five miles per hour or less. Nothing in this
section relieves golf cart operators of any statutory requirements associated with motor
vehicle operation within this state.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.